Nebraska, session 109, LB633.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB633 LB633
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-239, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-239 (1) If an application is rejected by the option school
district or if the resident school district rejects a request for release
under subsection (1) of section 79-237, the rejecting school district
shall provide written notification to the parent or guardian stating (a)
the specific reasons for the rejection including, for students with an
individualized education program under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., or with a diagnosed
disability as defined in section 79-1118.01, a description of services
and accommodations required that the school district does not have the
capacity to provide, and (b) the process for appealing such rejection to
the State Board of Education, and (c) the process for declining to appeal
and requesting a scholarship account. Such notification shall be sent by
certified mail.
(2) The parent or legal guardian may:
(a) Appeal appeal a rejection to the State Board of Education by
filing a written request, together with a copy of the rejection notice,
with the State Board of Education. Such request and copy of the notice
must be received by the board within thirty days after the date the
notification of the rejection was received by the parent or legal
guardian. Such hearing shall be held in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act and shall determine whether the procedures
of sections 79-234 to 79-241 have been followed. Any rejection based upon
capacity limitations established under section 79-238 shall be the
responsibility of the school district to prove in any appeal filed with
the state board; or .
(b) Decline to appeal and request an option enrollment tuition
account as described in section 2 of this act. Such request and copy of
the rejection notice must be received by the State Board of Education
within thirty days after the date when notification of the rejection was
-2-

LB633 LB633
2025 2025
received by the parent or legal guardian. Upon receipt of such request
and copy of the rejection notice, the board shall issue an option
enrollment tuition account to the parent or guardian.
(3)(a) Beginning July 1, 2024, and on or before July 1 of each year
thereafter, each school district shall provide to the State Department of
Education information prescribed by the Commissioner of Education
relating to all applications rejected by the option school district. Such
information shall include, but not be limited to, (a) the number of
applications rejected in each public school in such district, (b) an
explanation why each application was rejected, (c) whether each
application for option enrollment indicated that the student had an
individualized education program under the federal Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq., or had been
identified as a student with a disability as defined in section
79-1118.01, and (d) whether information regarding the requirements of
subsection (4) of section 79-238 was provided to the applicant.
(b) The Commissioner of Education shall annually compile the
information received pursuant to this subsection and provide a report on
such information electronically to the Legislature beginning on September
1, 2024, and on or before September 1 of each year thereafter. The State
Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this subsection.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Board means the State Board of Education;
(b) Eligible student means a student who has had their application
for the enrollment option program rejected by a public school district;
(c) Parent means a resident of the state who is a parent, a legal
guardian, or any other legal custodian of a child;
(d) Program means the Nebraska Option Enrollment Tuition Account
Program;
(e) Qualified education expense means the cost to educate an
-3-

LB633 LB633
2025 2025
eligible student attending a private, denominational, or parochial school
which fulfills applicable accreditation and approval requirements
established by the State Board of Education in section 79-318; and
(f) Scholarship account means an option enrollment tuition account
established through the program.
(2) The Nebraska Option Enrollment Tuition Account Program is
created. The program shall be administered by the board.
(3) The board shall establish and cause funds to be credited to a
scholarship account within fifteen calendar days upon receiving a notice
of a decline to appeal and a request for a scholarship account,
accompanied by a copy of the rejection notice provided pursuant to
subsection (1) of section 79-239.
(4) Pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the board shall
credit to a scholarship account for: (a) An eligible student, an amount
of funds equal to the adjusted average per pupil cost of the preceding
year as defined in section 79-1114; and (b) an eligible student who has a
disability as defined in section 79-1118.01, an additional amount of
funds equal to the reimbursement rate as provided in section 79-1142 of
the eligible student's resident school district.
(5) The board shall provide the parent of an eligible student access
to funds deposited into a scholarship account, upon a signed agreement
to: (a) Not enroll the eligible student as a full-time student in a
public school district; (b) use the funds in a scholarship account only
for qualified education expenses and provide verification upon request by
the board; and (c) comply with all other rules and requirements of the
program.
(6) A parent of an eligible student shall lose access to funds in a
scholarship account if: (a) The student reenrolls in a public school
district; (b) the student moves out of state; (c) the student graduates
from high school or earns a diploma of high school equivalency; or (d)
the parent or legal guardian of the eligible student fails to comply with
-4-

LB633 LB633
2025 2025
subsection (5) of this section.
(7) An eligible student shall be considered to satisfy the
compulsory school attendance requirements provided in section 79-201 so
long as the eligible student and such student's parent or legal guardian
comply with subsection (4) of this section.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed as granting any
expanded or additional authority to the State of Nebraska to control or
influence the governance or policies of any public, private, or
denominational school due to the fact that the school admits and enrolls
students who participate in the program or as requiring any such school
to admit or, once admitted, to continue the enrollment of any student
participating in the program.
(9) The board may use up to five percent of scholarship account
funds for purposes of administering the program, or may use such funds to
contract with a third party to assist in carrying out the program.
(10) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the program.
Sec. 3. Original section 79-239, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-